Ohio, session 136, HB330.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO:
Section 1. That sections 5739.02, 5739.03, and 5739.05 of 5
the Revised Code be amended to read as follows: 6
Sec. 5739.02. For the purpose of providing revenue with 7
which to meet the needs of the state, for the use of the general 8
revenue fund of the state, for the purpose of securing a 9
thorough and efficient system of common schools throughout the 10
state, for the purpose of affording revenues, in addition to 11
those from general property taxes, permitted under 12
constitutional limitations, and from other sources, for the 13
support of local governmental functions, and for the purpose of 14
reimbursing the state for the expense of administering this 15
chapter, an excise tax is hereby levied on each retail sale made 16
in this state. 17
(A)(1) The tax shall be collected as provided in section 18
5739.025 of the Revised Code. The rate of the tax shall be five 19

H. B. No. 330 Page 2
As Introduced
and three-fourths per cent. The tax applies and is collectible 20
when the sale is made, regardless of the time when the price is 21
paid or delivered. 22
(2) In the case of the lease or rental, with a fixed term 23
of more than thirty days or an indefinite term with a minimum 24
period of more than thirty days, of any motor vehicles designed 25
by the manufacturer to carry a load of not more than one ton, 26
watercraft, outboard motor, or aircraft, or of any tangible 27
personal property, other than motor vehicles designed by the 28
manufacturer to carry a load of more than one ton, to be used by 29
the lessee or renter primarily for business purposes, the tax 30
shall be collected by the vendor at the time the lease or rental 31
is consummated and shall be calculated by the vendor on the 32
basis of the total amount to be paid by the lessee or renter 33
under the lease agreement. If the total amount of the 34
consideration for the lease or rental includes amounts that are 35
not calculated at the time the lease or rental is executed, the 36
tax shall be calculated and collected by the vendor at the time 37
such amounts are billed to the lessee or renter. In the case of 38
an open-end lease or rental, the tax shall be calculated by the 39
vendor on the basis of the total amount to be paid during the 40
initial fixed term of the lease or rental, and for each 41
subsequent renewal period as it comes due. As used in this 42
division, "motor vehicle" has the same meaning as in section 43
4501.01 of the Revised Code, and "watercraft" includes an 44
outdrive unit attached to the watercraft. 45
A lease with a renewal clause and a termination penalty or 46
similar provision that applies if the renewal clause is not 47
exercised is presumed to be a sham transaction. In such a case, 48
the tax shall be calculated and paid on the basis of the entire 49
length of the lease period, including any renewal periods, until 50

H. B. No. 330 Page 3
As Introduced
the termination penalty or similar provision no longer applies. 51
The taxpayer shall bear the burden, by a preponderance of the 52
evidence, that the transaction or series of transactions is not 53
a sham transaction. 54
(3) Except as provided in division (A)(2) of this section, 55
in the case of a sale, the price of which consists in whole or 56
in part of the lease or rental of tangible personal property, 57
the tax shall be measured by the installments of that lease or 58
rental. 59
(4) In the case of a sale of a physical fitness facility 60
service or recreation and sports club service, the price of 61
which consists in whole or in part of a membership for the 62
receipt of the benefit of the service, the tax applicable to the 63
sale shall be measured by the installments thereof. 64
(B) The tax does not apply to the following: 65
(1) Sales to the state or any of its political 66
subdivisions, or to any other state or its political 67
subdivisions if the laws of that state exempt from taxation 68
sales made to this state and its political subdivisions 69
including either of the following: 70
(a) Sales or rentals of tangible personal property by 71
construction contractors or subcontractors to provide temporary 72
traffic control or temporary structures, including material and 73
equipment used to comply with the Ohio manual of uniform traffic 74
control devices adopted pursuant to section 4511.09 of the 75
Revised Code, whereby the state or any of its political 76
subdivisions take title to, or permanent or temporary possession 77
of, such tangible personal property for use by the state or any 78
of its political subdivisions, including for use by the general 79

H. B. No. 330 Page 4
As Introduced
public thereof; 80
(b) Sales of services by construction contractors or 81
subcontractors to provide temporary traffic control or 82
structures, including labor used to comply with the Ohio manual 83
of uniform traffic control devices adopted pursuant to section 84
4511.09 of the Revised Code, whereby the state or any of its 85
political subdivisions, including the general public thereof, 86
receive the benefit of such services. 87
As used in divisions (B)(1)(a) and (b) of this section, 88
"temporary structures" include temporary roads, bridges, drains, 89
and pavement. 90
(2) Sales of food for human consumption off the premises 91
where sold; 92
(3) Sales of food sold to students only in a cafeteria, 93
dormitory, fraternity, or sorority maintained in a private, 94
public, or parochial school, college, or university; 95
(4) Sales of newspapers and sales or transfers of 96
magazines distributed as controlled circulation publications; 97
(5) The furnishing, preparing, or serving of meals without 98
charge by an employer to an employee provided the employer 99
records the meals as part compensation for services performed or 100
work done; 101
(6)(a) Sales of motor fuel upon receipt, use, 102
distribution, or sale of which in this state a tax is imposed by 103
the law of this state, but this exemption shall not apply to the 104
sale of motor fuel on which a refund of the tax is allowable 105
under division (A) of section 5735.14 of the Revised Code; and 106
the tax commissioner may deduct the amount of tax levied by this 107
section applicable to the price of motor fuel when granting a 108

H. B. No. 330 Page 5
As Introduced
refund of motor fuel tax pursuant to division (A) of section 109
5735.14 of the Revised Code and shall cause the amount deducted 110
to be paid into the general revenue fund of this state; 111
(b) Sales of motor fuel other than that described in 112
division (B)(6)(a) of this section and used for powering a 113
refrigeration unit on a vehicle other than one used primarily to 114
provide comfort to the operator or occupants of the vehicle. 115
(7) Sales of natural gas by a natural gas company or 116
municipal gas utility, of water by a water-works company, or of 117
steam by a heating company, if in each case the thing sold is 118
delivered to consumers through pipes or conduits, and all sales 119
of communications services by a telegraph company, all terms as 120
defined in section 5727.01 of the Revised Code, and sales of 121
electricity delivered through wires; 122
(8) Casual sales by a person, or auctioneer employed 123
directly by the person to conduct such sales, except as to such 124
sales of motor vehicles, watercraft or outboard motors required 125
to be titled under section 1548.06 of the Revised Code, 126
watercraft documented with the United States coast guard, 127
snowmobiles, and all-purpose vehicles as defined in section 128
4519.01 of the Revised Code; 129
(9)(a) Sales of services or tangible personal property, 130
other than motor vehicles, mobile homes, and manufactured homes, 131
by churches, organizations exempt from taxation under section 132
501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, or nonprofit 133
organizations operated exclusively for charitable purposes as 134
defined in division (B)(12) of this section, provided that the 135
number of days on which such tangible personal property or 136
services, other than items never subject to the tax, are sold 137
does not exceed six in any calendar year, except as otherwise 138

H. B. No. 330 Page 6
As Introduced
provided in division (B)(9)(b) of this section. If the number of 139
days on which such sales are made exceeds six in any calendar 140
year, the church or organization shall be considered to be 141
engaged in business and all subsequent sales by it shall be 142
subject to the tax. In counting the number of days, all sales by 143
groups within a church or within an organization shall be 144
considered to be sales of that church or organization. 145
(b) The limitation on the number of days on which tax- 146
exempt sales may be made by a church or organization under 147
division (B)(9)(a) of this section does not apply to sales made 148
by student clubs and other groups of students of a primary or 149
secondary school, or a parent-teacher association, booster 150
group, or similar organization that raises money to support or 151
fund curricular or extracurricular activities of a primary or 152
secondary school. 153
(c) Divisions (B)(9)(a) and (b) of this section do not 154
apply to sales by a noncommercial educational radio or 155
television broadcasting station. 156
(10) Sales not within the taxing power of this state under 157
the Constitution or laws of the United States or the 158
Constitution of this state including either of the following: 159
(a) Sales or rentals of tangible personal property by 160
construction contractors or subcontractors to provide temporary 161
traffic control or temporary structures, including material and 162
equipment used to comply with the Ohio manual of uniform traffic 163
control devices adopted pursuant to section 4511.09 of the 164
Revised Code, whereby the United States takes title to, or 165
permanent or temporary possession of, such tangible personal 166
property for use by the United States including for use by the 167
general public thereof; 168

H. B. No. 330 Page 7
As Introduced
(b) Sales of services by construction contractors or 169
subcontractors to provide temporary traffic control or 170
structures, including labor used to comply with the Ohio manual 171
of uniform traffic control devices adopted pursuant to section 172
4511.09 of the Revised Code, whereby the United States, 173
including the general public thereof, receives the benefit of 174
such services. 175
As used in divisions (B)(10)(a) and (b) of this section, 176
"temporary structures" include temporary roads, bridges, drains, 177
and pavement. 178
(11) Except for transactions that are sales under division 179
(B)(3)(p) of section 5739.01 of the Revised Code, the 180
transportation of persons or property, unless the transportation 181
is by a private investigation and security service; 182
(12) Sales of tangible personal property or services to 183
churches, to organizations exempt from taxation under section 184
501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, and to any other 185
nonprofit organizations operated exclusively for charitable 186
purposes in this state, no part of the net income of which 187
inures to the benefit of any private shareholder or individual, 188
and no substantial part of the activities of which consists of 189
carrying on propaganda or otherwise attempting to influence 190
legislation; sales to offices administering one or more homes 191
for the aged or one or more hospital facilities exempt under 192
section 140.08 of the Revised Code; and sales to organizations 193
described in division (D) of section 5709.12 of the Revised 194
Code. 195
"Charitable purposes" means the relief of poverty; the 196
improvement of health through the alleviation of illness, 197
disease, or injury; the operation of an organization exclusively 198

H. B. No. 330 Page 8
As Introduced
for the provision of professional, laundry, printing, and 199
purchasing services to hospitals or charitable institutions; the 200
operation of a home for the aged, as defined in section 5701.13 201
of the Revised Code; the operation of a radio or television 202
broadcasting station that is licensed by the federal 203
communications commission as a noncommercial educational radio 204
or television station; the operation of a nonprofit animal 205
adoption service or a county humane society; the promotion of 206
education by an institution of learning that maintains a faculty 207
of qualified instructors, teaches regular continuous courses of 208
study, and confers a recognized diploma upon completion of a 209
specific curriculum; the operation of a parent-teacher 210
association, booster group, or similar organization primarily 211
engaged in the promotion and support of the curricular or 212
extracurricular activities of a primary or secondary school; the 213
operation of a community or area center in which presentations 214
in music, dramatics, the arts, and related fields are made in 215
order to foster public interest and education therein; the 216
production of performances in music, dramatics, and the arts; or 217
the promotion of education by an organization engaged in 218
carrying on research in, or the dissemination of, scientific and 219
technological knowledge and information primarily for the 220
public. 221
Nothing in this division shall be deemed to exempt sales 222
to any organization for use in the operation or carrying on of a 223
trade or business, or sales to a home for the aged for use in 224
the operation of independent living facilities as defined in 225
division (A) of section 5709.12 of the Revised Code. 226
(13) Building and construction materials and services sold 227
to construction contractors for incorporation into a structure 228
or improvement to real property under a construction contract 229

H. B. No. 330 Page 9
As Introduced
with this state or a political subdivision of this state, or 230
with the United States government or any of its agencies; 231
building and construction materials and services sold to 232
construction contractors for incorporation into a structure or 233
improvement to real property that are accepted for ownership by 234
this state or any of its political subdivisions, or by the 235
United States government or any of its agencies at the time of 236
completion of the structures or improvements; building and 237
construction materials sold to construction contractors for 238
incorporation into a horticulture structure or livestock 239
structure for a person engaged in the business of horticulture 240
or producing livestock; building materials and services sold to 241
a construction contractor for incorporation into a house of 242
public worship or religious education, or a building used 243
exclusively for charitable purposes under a construction 244
contract with an organization whose purpose is as described in 245
division (B)(12) of this section; building materials and 246
services sold to a construction contractor for incorporation 247
into a building under a construction contract with an 248
organization exempt from taxation under section 501(c)(3) of the 249
Internal Revenue Code of 1986 when the building is to be used 250
exclusively for the organization's exempt purposes; tangible 251
personal property sold for incorporation into the construction 252
of a sports facility under section 307.696 of the Revised Code; 253
building and construction materials and services sold to a 254
construction contractor for incorporation into real property 255
outside this state if such materials and services, when sold to 256
a construction contractor in the state in which the real 257
property is located for incorporation into real property in that 258
state, would be exempt from a tax on sales levied by that state; 259
building and construction materials for incorporation into a 260
transportation facility pursuant to a public-private agreement 261

H. B. No. 330 Page 10
As Introduced
entered into under sections 5501.70 to 5501.83 of the Revised 262
Code; until one calendar year after the construction of a 263
convention center that qualifies for property tax exemption 264
under section 5709.084 of the Revised Code is completed, 265
building and construction materials and services sold to a 266
construction contractor for incorporation into the real property 267
comprising that convention center; and building and construction 268
materials sold for incorporation into a structure or improvement 269
to real property that is used primarily as, or primarily in 270
support of, a manufacturing facility or research and development 271
facility and that is to be owned by a megaproject operator upon 272
completion and located at the site of a megaproject that 273
satisfies the criteria described in division (A)(11)(a)(ii) of 274
section 122.17 of the Revised Code, provided that the sale 275
occurs during the period that the megaproject operator has an 276
agreement for such megaproject with the tax credit authority 277
under division (D) of section 122.17 of the Revised Code that 278
remains in effect and has not expired or been terminated. 279
(14) Sales of ships or vessels or rail rolling stock used 280
or to be used principally in interstate or foreign commerce, and 281
repairs, alterations, fuel, and lubricants for such ships or 282
vessels or rail rolling stock; 283
(15) Sales to persons primarily engaged in any of the 284
activities mentioned in division (B)(42)(a), (g), or (h) of this 285
section, to persons engaged in making retail sales, or to 286
persons who purchase for sale from a manufacturer tangible 287
personal property that was produced by the manufacturer in 288
accordance with specific designs provided by the purchaser, of 289
packages, including material, labels, and parts for packages, 290
and of machinery, equipment, and material for use primarily in 291
packaging tangible personal property produced for sale, 292

H. B. No. 330 Page 11
As Introduced
including any machinery, equipment, and supplies used to make 293
labels or packages, to prepare packages or products for 294
labeling, or to label packages or products, by or on the order 295
of the person doing the packaging, or sold at retail. "Packages" 296
includes bags, baskets, cartons, crates, boxes, cans, bottles, 297
bindings, wrappings, and other similar devices and containers, 298
but does not include motor vehicles or bulk tanks, trailers, or 299
similar devices attached to motor vehicles. "Packaging" means 300
placing in a package. Division (B)(15) of this section does not 301
apply to persons engaged in highway transportation for hire. 302
(16) Sales of food to persons using supplemental nutrition 303
assistance program benefits to purchase the food. As used in 304
this division, "food" has the same meaning as in 7 U.S.C. 2012 305
and federal regulations adopted pursuant to the Food and 306
Nutrition Act of 2008. 307
(17) Sales to persons engaged in farming, agriculture, 308
horticulture, or floriculture, of tangible personal property for 309
use or consumption primarily in the production by farming, 310
agriculture, horticulture, or floriculture of other tangible 311
personal property for use or consumption primarily in the 312
production of tangible personal property for sale by farming, 313
agriculture, horticulture, or floriculture; or material and 314
parts for incorporation into any such tangible personal property 315
for use or consumption in production; and of tangible personal 316
property for such use or consumption in the conditioning or 317
holding of products produced by and for such use, consumption, 318
or sale by persons engaged in farming, agriculture, 319
horticulture, or floriculture, except where such property is 320
incorporated into real property; 321
(18) Sales of drugs for a human being that may be 322

H. B. No. 330 Page 12
As Introduced
dispensed only pursuant to a prescription; insulin as recognized 323
in the official United States pharmacopoeia; urine and blood 324
testing materials when used by diabetics or persons with 325
hypoglycemia to test for glucose or acetone; hypodermic syringes 326
and needles when used by diabetics for insulin injections; 327
epoetin alfa when purchased for use in the treatment of persons 328
with medical disease; hospital beds when purchased by hospitals, 329
nursing homes, or other medical facilities; and medical oxygen 330
and medical oxygen-dispensing equipment when purchased by 331
hospitals, nursing homes, or other medical facilities; 332
(19) Sales of prosthetic devices, durable medical 333
equipment for home use, or mobility enhancing equipment, when 334
made pursuant to a prescription and when such devices or 335
equipment are for use by a human being. 336
(20) Sales of emergency and fire protection vehicles and 337
equipment to nonprofit organizations for use solely in providing 338
fire protection and emergency services, including trauma care 339
and emergency medical services, for political subdivisions of 340
the state; 341
(21) Sales of tangible personal property manufactured in 342
this state, if sold by the manufacturer in this state to a 343
retailer for use in the retail business of the retailer outside 344
of this state and if possession is taken from the manufacturer 345
by the purchaser within this state for the sole purpose of 346
immediately removing the same from this state in a vehicle owned 347
by the purchaser; 348
(22) Sales of services provided by the state or any of its 349
political subdivisions, agencies, instrumentalities, 350
institutions, or authorities, or by governmental entities of the 351
state or any of its political subdivisions, agencies, 352

H. B. No. 330 Page 13
As Introduced
instrumentalities, institutions, or authorities; 353
(23) Sales of motor vehicles to nonresidents of this state 354
under the circumstances described in division (B) of section 355
5739.029 of the Revised Code; 356
(24) Sales to persons engaged in the preparation of eggs 357
for sale of tangible personal property used or consumed directly 358
in such preparation, including such tangible personal property 359
used for cleaning, sanitizing, preserving, grading, sorting, and 360
classifying by size; packages, including material and parts for 361
packages, and machinery, equipment, and material for use in 362
packaging eggs for sale; and handling and transportation 363
equipment and parts therefor, except motor vehicles licensed to 364
operate on public highways, used in intraplant or interplant 365
transfers or shipment of eggs in the process of preparation for 366
sale, when the plant or plants within or between which such 367
transfers or shipments occur are operated by the same person. 368
"Packages" includes containers, cases, baskets, flats, fillers, 369
filler flats, cartons, closure materials, labels, and labeling 370
materials, and "packaging" means placing therein. 371
(25)(a) Sales of water to a consumer for residential use; 372
(b) Sales of water by a nonprofit corporation engaged 373
exclusively in the treatment, distribution, and sale of water to 374
consumers, if such water is delivered to consumers through pipes 375
or tubing. 376
(26) Fees charged for inspection or reinspection of motor 377
vehicles under section 3704.14 of the Revised Code; 378
(27) Sales to persons licensed to conduct a food service 379
operation pursuant to section 3717.43 of the Revised Code, of 380
tangible personal property primarily used directly for the 381

H. B. No. 330 Page 14
As Introduced
following: 382
(a) To prepare food for human consumption for sale; 383
(b) To preserve food that has been or will be prepared for 384
human consumption for sale by the food service operator, not 385
including tangible personal property used to display food for 386
selection by the consumer; 387
(c) To clean tangible personal property used to prepare or 388
serve food for human consumption for sale. 389
(28) Sales of animals by nonprofit animal adoption 390
services or county humane societies; 391
(29) Sales of services to a corporation described in 392
division (A) of section 5709.72 of the Revised Code, and sales 393
of tangible personal property that qualifies for exemption from 394
taxation under section 5709.72 of the Revised Code; 395
(30) Sales and installation of agricultural land tile, as 396
defined in division (B)(5)(a) of section 5739.01 of the Revised 397
Code; 398
(31) Sales and erection or installation of portable grain 399
bins, as defined in division (B)(5)(b) of section 5739.01 of the 400
Revised Code; 401
(32) The sale, lease, repair, and maintenance of, parts 402
for, or items attached to or incorporated in, motor vehicles 403
that are primarily used for transporting tangible personal 404
property belonging to others by a person engaged in highway 405
transportation for hire, except for packages and packaging used 406
for the transportation of tangible personal property; 407
(33) Sales to the state headquarters of any veterans' 408
organization in this state that is either incorporated and 409

H. B. No. 330 Page 15
As Introduced
issued a charter by the congress of the United States or is 410
recognized by the United States veterans administration, for use 411
by the headquarters; 412
(34) Sales to a telecommunications service vendor, mobile 413
telecommunications service vendor, or satellite broadcasting 414
service vendor of tangible personal property and services used 415
directly and primarily in transmitting, receiving, switching, or 416
recording any interactive, one- or two-way electromagnetic 417
communications, including voice, image, data, and information, 418
through the use of any medium, including, but not limited to, 419
poles, wires, cables, switching equipment, computers, and record 420
storage devices and media, and component parts for the tangible 421
personal property. The exemption provided in this division shall 422
be in lieu of all other exemptions under division (B)(42)(a) or 423
(n) of this section to which the vendor may otherwise be 424
entitled, based upon the use of the thing purchased in providing 425
the telecommunications, mobile telecommunications, or satellite 426
broadcasting service. 427
(35)(a) Sales where the purpose of the consumer is to use 428
or consume the things transferred in making retail sales and 429
consisting of newspaper inserts, catalogues, coupons, flyers, 430
gift certificates, or other advertising material that prices and 431
describes tangible personal property offered for retail sale. 432
(b) Sales to direct marketing vendors of preliminary 433
materials such as photographs, artwork, and typesetting that 434
will be used in printing advertising material; and of printed 435
matter that offers free merchandise or chances to win sweepstake 436
prizes and that is mailed to potential customers with 437
advertising material described in division (B)(35)(a) of this 438
section; 439

H. B. No. 330 Page 16
As Introduced
(c) Sales of equipment such as telephones, computers, 440
facsimile machines, and similar tangible personal property 441
primarily used to accept orders for direct marketing retail 442
sales. 443
(d) Sales of automatic food vending machines that preserve 444
food with a shelf life of forty-five days or less by 445
refrigeration and dispense it to the consumer. 446
For purposes of division (B)(35) of this section, "direct 447
marketing" means the method of selling where consumers order 448
tangible personal property by United States mail, delivery 449
service, or telecommunication and the vendor delivers or ships 450
the tangible personal property sold to the consumer from a 451
warehouse, catalogue distribution center, or similar fulfillment 452
facility by means of the United States mail, delivery service, 453
or common carrier. 454
(36) Sales to a person engaged in the business of 455
horticulture or producing livestock of materials to be 456
incorporated into a horticulture structure or livestock 457
structure; 458
(37) Sales of personal computers, computer monitors, 459
computer keyboards, modems, and other peripheral computer 460
equipment to an individual who is licensed or certified to teach 461
in an elementary or a secondary school in this state for use by 462
that individual in preparation for teaching elementary or 463
secondary school students; 464
(38) Sales of tangible personal property that is not 465
required to be registered or licensed under the laws of this 466
state to a citizen of a foreign nation that is not a citizen of 467
the United States, provided the property is delivered to a 468

H. B. No. 330 Page 17
As Introduced
person in this state that is not a related member of the 469
purchaser, is physically present in this state for the sole 470
purpose of temporary storage and package consolidation, and is 471
subsequently delivered to the purchaser at a delivery address in 472
a foreign nation. As used in division (B)(38) of this section, 473
"related member" has the same meaning as in section 5733.042 of 474
the Revised Code, and "temporary storage" means the storage of 475
tangible personal property for a period of not more than sixty 476
days. 477
(39) Sales of used manufactured homes and used mobile 478
homes, as defined in section 5739.0210 of the Revised Code, made 479
on or after January 1, 2000; 480
(40) Sales of tangible personal property and services to a 481
provider of electricity used or consumed directly and primarily 482
in generating, transmitting, or distributing electricity for use 483
by others, including property that is or is to be incorporated 484
into and will become a part of the consumer's production, 485
transmission, or distribution system and that retains its 486
classification as tangible personal property after 487
incorporation; fuel or power used in the production, 488
transmission, or distribution of electricity; energy conversion 489
equipment as defined in section 5727.01 of the Revised Code; and 490
tangible personal property and services used in the repair and 491
maintenance of the production, transmission, or distribution 492
system, including only those motor vehicles as are specially 493
designed and equipped for such use. The exemption provided in 494
this division shall be in lieu of all other exemptions in 495
division (B)(42)(a) or (n) of this section to which a provider 496
of electricity may otherwise be entitled based on the use of the 497
tangible personal property or service purchased in generating, 498
transmitting, or distributing electricity. 499

H. B. No. 330 Page 18
As Introduced
(41) Sales to a person providing services under division 500
(B)(3)(p) of section 5739.01 of the Revised Code of tangible 501
personal property and services used directly and primarily in 502
providing taxable services under that section. 503
(42) Sales where the purpose of the purchaser is to do any 504
of the following: 505
(a) To incorporate the thing transferred as a material or 506
a part into tangible personal property to be produced for sale 507
by manufacturing, assembling, processing, or refining; or to use 508
or consume the thing transferred directly in producing tangible 509
personal property for sale by mining, including, without 510
limitation, the extraction from the earth of all substances that 511
are classed geologically as minerals, or directly in the 512
rendition of a public utility service, except that the sales tax 513
levied by this section shall be collected upon all meals, 514
drinks, and food for human consumption sold when transporting 515
persons. This paragraph does not exempt from "retail sale" or 516
"sales at retail" the sale of tangible personal property that is 517
to be incorporated into a structure or improvement to real 518
property. 519
(b) To hold the thing transferred as security for the 520
performance of an obligation of the vendor; 521
(c) To resell, hold, use, or consume the thing transferred 522
as evidence of a contract of insurance; 523
(d) To use or consume the thing directly in commercial 524
fishing; 525
(e) To incorporate the thing transferred as a material or 526
a part into, or to use or consume the thing transferred directly 527
in the production of, magazines distributed as controlled 528

H. B. No. 330 Page 19
As Introduced
circulation publications; 529
(f) To use or consume the thing transferred in the 530
production and preparation in suitable condition for market and 531
sale of printed, imprinted, overprinted, lithographic, 532
multilithic, blueprinted, photostatic, or other productions or 533
reproductions of written or graphic matter; 534
(g) To use the thing transferred, as described in section 535
5739.011 of the Revised Code, primarily in a manufacturing 536
operation to produce tangible personal property for sale; 537
(h) To use the benefit of a warranty, maintenance or 538
service contract, or similar agreement, as described in division 539
(B)(7) of section 5739.01 of the Revised Code, to repair or 540
maintain tangible personal property, if all of the property that 541
is the subject of the warranty, contract, or agreement would not 542
be subject to the tax imposed by this section; 543
(i) To use the thing transferred as qualified research and 544
development equipment; 545
(j) To use or consume the thing transferred primarily in 546
storing, transporting, mailing, or otherwise handling purchased 547
sales inventory in a warehouse, distribution center, or similar 548
facility when the inventory is primarily distributed outside 549
this state to retail stores of the person who owns or controls 550
the warehouse, distribution center, or similar facility, to 551
retail stores of an affiliated group of which that person is a 552
member, or by means of direct marketing. This division does not 553
apply to motor vehicles registered for operation on the public 554
highways. As used in this division, "affiliated group" has the 555
same meaning as in division (B)(3)(e) of section 5739.01 of the 556
Revised Code and "direct marketing" has the same meaning as in 557

H. B. No. 330 Page 20
As Introduced
division (B)(35) of this section. 558
(k) To use or consume the thing transferred to fulfill a 559
contractual obligation incurred by a warrantor pursuant to a 560
warranty provided as a part of the price of the tangible 561
personal property sold or by a vendor of a warranty, maintenance 562
or service contract, or similar agreement the provision of which 563
is defined as a sale under division (B)(7) of section 5739.01 of 564
the Revised Code; 565
(l) To use or consume the thing transferred in the 566
production of a newspaper for distribution to the public; 567
(m) To use tangible personal property to perform a service 568
listed in division (B)(3) of section 5739.01 of the Revised 569
Code, if the property is or is to be permanently transferred to 570
the consumer of the service as an integral part of the 571
performance of the service; 572
(n) To use or consume the thing transferred primarily in 573
producing tangible personal property for sale by farming, 574
agriculture, horticulture, or floriculture. Persons engaged in 575
rendering farming, agriculture, horticulture, or floriculture 576
services for others are deemed engaged primarily in farming, 577
agriculture, horticulture, or floriculture. This paragraph does 578
not exempt from "retail sale" or "sales at retail" the sale of 579
tangible personal property that is to be incorporated into a 580
structure or improvement to real property. 581
(o) To use or consume the thing transferred in acquiring, 582
formatting, editing, storing, and disseminating data or 583
information by electronic publishing; 584
(p) To provide the thing transferred to the owner or 585
lessee of a motor vehicle that is being repaired or serviced, if 586

H. B. No. 330 Page 21
As Introduced
the thing transferred is a rented motor vehicle and the 587
purchaser is reimbursed for the cost of the rented motor vehicle 588
by a manufacturer, warrantor, or provider of a maintenance, 589
service, or other similar contract or agreement, with respect to 590
the motor vehicle that is being repaired or serviced; 591
(q) To use or consume the thing transferred directly in 592
production of crude oil and natural gas for sale. Persons 593
engaged in rendering production services for others are deemed 594
engaged in production. 595
As used in division (B)(42)(q) of this section, 596
"production" means operations and tangible personal property 597
directly used to expose and evaluate an underground reservoir 598
that may contain hydrocarbon resources, prepare the wellbore for 599
production, and lift and control all substances yielded by the 600
reservoir to the surface of the earth. 601
(i) For the purposes of division (B)(42)(q) of this 602
section, the "thing transferred" includes, but is not limited 603
to, any of the following: 604
(I) Services provided in the construction of permanent 605
access roads, services provided in the construction of the well 606
site, and services provided in the construction of temporary 607
impoundments; 608
(II) Equipment and rigging used for the specific purpose 609
of creating with integrity a wellbore pathway to underground 610
reservoirs; 611
(III) Drilling and workover services used to work within a 612
subsurface wellbore, and tangible personal property directly 613
used in providing such services; 614
(IV) Casing, tubulars, and float and centralizing 615

H. B. No. 330 Page 22
As Introduced
equipment; 616
(V) Trailers to which production equipment is attached; 617
(VI) Well completion services, including cementing of 618
casing, and tangible personal property directly used in 619
providing such services; 620
(VII) Wireline evaluation, mud logging, and perforation 621
services, and tangible personal property directly used in 622
providing such services; 623
(VIII) Reservoir stimulation, hydraulic fracturing, and 624
acidizing services, and tangible personal property directly used 625
in providing such services, including all material pumped 626
downhole; 627
(IX) Pressure pumping equipment; 628
(X) Artificial lift systems equipment; 629
(XI) Wellhead equipment and well site equipment used to 630
separate, stabilize, and control hydrocarbon phases and produced 631
water; 632
(XII) Tangible personal property directly used to control 633
production equipment. 634
(ii) For the purposes of division (B)(42)(q) of this 635
section, the "thing transferred" does not include any of the 636
following: 637
(I) Tangible personal property used primarily in the 638
exploration and production of any mineral resource regulated 639
under Chapter 1509. of the Revised Code other than oil or gas; 640
(II) Tangible personal property used primarily in storing, 641
holding, or delivering solutions or chemicals used in well 642

H. B. No. 330 Page 23
As Introduced
stimulation as defined in section 1509.01 of the Revised Code; 643
(III) Tangible personal property used primarily in 644
preparing, installing, or reclaiming foundations for drilling or 645
pumping equipment or well stimulation material tanks; 646
(IV) Tangible personal property used primarily in 647
transporting, delivering, or removing equipment to or from the 648
well site or storing such equipment before its use at the well 649
site; 650
(V) Tangible personal property used primarily in gathering 651
operations occurring off the well site, including gathering 652
pipelines transporting hydrocarbon gas or liquids away from a 653
crude oil or natural gas production facility; 654
(VI) Tangible personal property that is to be incorporated 655
into a structure or improvement to real property; 656
(VII) Well site fencing, lighting, or security systems; 657
(VIII) Communication devices or services; 658
(IX) Office supplies; 659
(X) Trailers used as offices or lodging; 660
(XI) Motor vehicles of any kind; 661
(XII) Tangible personal property used primarily for the 662
storage of drilling byproducts and fuel not used for production; 663
(XIII) Tangible personal property used primarily as a 664
safety device; 665
(XIV) Data collection or monitoring devices; 666
(XV) Access ladders, stairs, or platforms attached to 667
storage tanks. 668

H. B. No. 330 Page 24
As Introduced
The enumeration of tangible personal property in division 669
(B)(42)(q)(ii) of this section is not intended to be exhaustive, 670
and any tangible personal property not so enumerated shall not 671
necessarily be construed to be a "thing transferred" for the 672
purposes of division (B)(42)(q) of this section. 673
The commissioner shall adopt and promulgate rules under 674
sections 119.01 to 119.13 of the Revised Code that the 675
commissioner deems necessary to administer division (B)(42)(q) 676
of this section. 677
As used in division (B)(42) of this section, "thing" 678
includes all transactions included in divisions (B)(3)(a), (b), 679
and (e) of section 5739.01 of the Revised Code. 680
(43) Sales conducted through a coin operated device that 681
activates vacuum equipment or equipment that dispenses water, 682
whether or not in combination with soap or other cleaning agents 683
or wax, to the consumer for the consumer's use on the premises 684
in washing, cleaning, or waxing a motor vehicle, provided no 685
other personal property or personal service is provided as part 686
of the transaction. 687
(44) Sales of replacement and modification parts for 688
engines, airframes, instruments, and interiors in, and paint 689
for, aircraft used primarily in a fractional aircraft ownership 690
program, and sales of services for the repair, modification, and 691
maintenance of such aircraft, and machinery, equipment, and 692
supplies primarily used to provide those services. 693
(45) Sales of telecommunications service that is used 694
directly and primarily to perform the functions of a call 695
center. As used in this division, "call center" means any 696
physical location where telephone calls are placed or received 697

H. B. No. 330 Page 25
As Introduced
in high volume for the purpose of making sales, marketing, 698
customer service, technical support, or other specialized 699
business activity, and that employs at least fifty individuals 700
that engage in call center activities on a full-time basis, or 701
sufficient individuals to fill fifty full-time equivalent 702
positions. 703
(46) Sales by a telecommunications service vendor of 900 704
service to a subscriber. This division does not apply to 705
information services. 706
(47) Sales of value-added non-voice data service. This 707
division does not apply to any similar service that is not 708
otherwise a telecommunications service. 709
(48) Sales of feminine hygiene products. 710
(49) Sales of materials, parts, equipment, or engines used 711
in the repair or maintenance of aircraft or avionics systems of 712
such aircraft, and sales of repair, remodeling, replacement, or 713
maintenance services in this state performed on aircraft or on 714
an aircraft's avionics, engine, or component materials or parts. 715
As used in division (B)(49) of this section, "aircraft" means 716
aircraft of more than six thousand pounds maximum certified 717
takeoff weight or used exclusively in general aviation. 718
(50) Sales of full flight simulators that are used for 719
pilot or flight-crew training, sales of repair or replacement 720
parts or components, and sales of repair or maintenance services 721
for such full flight simulators. "Full flight simulator" means a 722
replica of a specific type, or make, model, and series of 723
aircraft cockpit. It includes the assemblage of equipment and 724
computer programs necessary to represent aircraft operations in 725
ground and flight conditions, a visual system providing an out- 726

H. B. No. 330 Page 26
As Introduced
of-the-cockpit view, and a system that provides cues at least 727
equivalent to those of a three-degree-of-freedom motion system, 728
and has the full range of capabilities of the systems installed 729
in the device as described in appendices A and B of part 60 of 730
chapter 1 of title 14 of the Code of Federal Regulations. 731
(51) Any transfer or lease of tangible personal property 732
between the state and JobsOhio in accordance with section 733
4313.02 of the Revised Code. 734
(52)(a) Sales to a qualifying corporation. 735
(b) As used in division (B)(52) of this section: 736
(i) "Qualifying corporation" means a nonprofit corporation 737
organized in this state that leases from an eligible county 738
land, buildings, structures, fixtures, and improvements to the 739
land that are part of or used in a public recreational facility 740
used by a major league professional athletic team or a class A 741
to class AAA minor league affiliate of a major league 742
professional athletic team for a significant portion of the 743
team's home schedule, provided the following apply: 744
(I) The facility is leased from the eligible county 745
pursuant to a lease that requires substantially all of the 746
revenue from the operation of the business or activity conducted 747
by the nonprofit corporation at the facility in excess of 748
operating costs, capital expenditures, and reserves to be paid 749
to the eligible county at least once per calendar year. 750
(II) Upon dissolution and liquidation of the nonprofit 751
corporation, all of its net assets are distributable to the 752
board of commissioners of the eligible county from which the 753
corporation leases the facility. 754
(ii) "Eligible county" has the same meaning as in section 755

H. B. No. 330 Page 27
As Introduced
307.695 of the Revised Code. 756
(53) Sales to or by a cable service provider, video 757
service provider, or radio or television broadcast station 758
regulated by the federal government of cable service or 759
programming, video service or programming, audio service or 760
programming, or electronically transferred digital audiovisual 761
or audio work. As used in division (B)(53) of this section, 762
"cable service" and "cable service provider" have the same 763
meanings as in section 1332.01 of the Revised Code, and "video 764
service," "video service provider," and "video programming" have 765
the same meanings as in section 1332.21 of the Revised Code. 766
(54) Sales of a digital audio work electronically 767
transferred for delivery through use of a machine, such as a 768
juke box, that does all of the following: 769
(a) Accepts direct payments to operate; 770
(b) Automatically plays a selected digital audio work for 771
a single play upon receipt of a payment described in division 772
(B)(54)(a) of this section; 773
(c) Operates exclusively for the purpose of playing 774
digital audio works in a commercial establishment. 775
(55)(a) Sales of the following occurring on the first 776
Friday of August and the following Saturday and Sunday of any 777
year, except in 2024 or any subsequent year in which a sales tax 778
holiday is held pursuant to section 5739.41 of the Revised Code: 779
(i) An item of clothing, the price of which is seventy- 780
five dollars or less; 781
(ii) An item of school supplies, the price of which is 782
twenty dollars or less; 783

H. B. No. 330 Page 28
As Introduced
(iii) An item of school instructional material, the price 784
of which is twenty dollars or less. 785
(b) As used in division (B)(55) of this section: 786
(i) "Clothing" means all human wearing apparel suitable 787
for general use. "Clothing" includes, but is not limited to, 788
aprons, household and shop; athletic supporters; baby receiving 789
blankets; bathing suits and caps; beach capes and coats; belts 790
and suspenders; boots; coats and jackets; costumes; diapers, 791
children and adult, including disposable diapers; earmuffs; 792
footlets; formal wear; garters and garter belts; girdles; gloves 793
and mittens for general use; hats and caps; hosiery; insoles for 794
shoes; lab coats; neckties; overshoes; pantyhose; rainwear; 795
rubber pants; sandals; scarves; shoes and shoe laces; slippers; 796
sneakers; socks and stockings; steel-toed shoes; underwear; 797
uniforms, athletic and nonathletic; and wedding apparel. 798
"Clothing" does not include items purchased for use in a trade 799
or business; clothing accessories or equipment; protective 800
equipment; sports or recreational equipment; belt buckles sold 801
separately; costume masks sold separately; patches and emblems 802
sold separately; sewing equipment and supplies including, but 803
not limited to, knitting needles, patterns, pins, scissors, 804
sewing machines, sewing needles, tape measures, and thimbles; 805
and sewing materials that become part of "clothing" including, 806
but not limited to, buttons, fabric, lace, thread, yarn, and 807
zippers. 808
(ii) "School supplies" means items commonly used by a 809
student in a course of study. "School supplies" includes only 810
the following items: binders; book bags; calculators; cellophane 811
tape; blackboard chalk; compasses; composition books; crayons; 812
erasers; folders, expandable, pocket, plastic, and manila; glue, 813

H. B. No. 330 Page 29
As Introduced
paste, and paste sticks; highlighters; index cards; index card 814
boxes; legal pads; lunch boxes; markers; notebooks; paper, 815
loose-leaf ruled notebook paper, copy paper, graph paper, 816
tracing paper, manila paper, colored paper, poster board, and 817
construction paper; pencil boxes and other school supply boxes; 818
pencil sharpeners; pencils; pens; protractors; rulers; scissors; 819
and writing tablets. "School supplies" does not include any item 820
purchased for use in a trade or business. 821
(iii) "School instructional material" means written 822
material commonly used by a student in a course of study as a 823
reference and to learn the subject being taught. "School 824
instructional material" includes only the following items: 825
reference books, reference maps and globes, textbooks, and 826
workbooks. "School instructional material" does not include any 827
material purchased for use in a trade or business. 828
(56)(a) Sales of adult diapers or incontinence underpads 829
sold pursuant to a prescription, for the benefit of a medicaid 830
recipient with a diagnosis of incontinence, and by a medicaid 831
provider that maintains a valid provider agreement under section 832
5164.30 of the Revised Code with the department of medicaid, 833
provided that the medicaid program covers diapers or 834
incontinence underpads as an incontinence garment. 835
(b) As used in division (B)(56)(a) of this section, 836
"incontinence underpad" means an absorbent product, not worn on 837
the body, designed to protect furniture or other tangible 838
personal property from soiling or damage due to human 839
incontinence. 840
(57) Sales of investment metal bullion and investment 841
coins. "Investment metal bullion" means any bullion described in 842
section 408(m)(3)(B) of the Internal Revenue Code, regardless of 843

H. B. No. 330 Page 30
As Introduced
whether that bullion is in the physical possession of a trustee. 844
"Investment coin" means any coin composed primarily of gold, 845
silver, platinum, or palladium. 846
(58) Sales of tangible personal property used primarily 847
for any of the following purposes by a megaproject operator at 848
the site of a megaproject that satisfies the criteria described 849
in division (A)(11)(a)(ii) of section 122.17 of the Revised 850
Code, provided that the sale occurs during the period that the 851
megaproject operator has an agreement for such megaproject with 852
the tax credit authority under division (D) of section 122.17 of 853
the Revised Code that remains in effect and has not expired or 854
been terminated: 855
(a) To store, transmit, convey, distribute, recycle, 856
circulate, or clean water, steam, or other gases used in or 857
produced as a result of manufacturing activity, including items 858
that support or aid in the operation of such property; 859
(b) To clean or prepare inventory, at any stage of storage 860
or production, or equipment used in a manufacturing activity, 861
including chemicals, solvents, catalysts, soaps, and other items 862
that support or aid in the operation of property; 863
(c) To regulate, treat, filter, condition, improve, clean, 864
maintain, or monitor environmental conditions within areas where 865
manufacturing activities take place; 866
(d) To handle, transport, or convey inventory during 867
production or manufacturing. 868
(59) Documentary services charges imposed pursuant to 869
section 4517.261 or 4781.24 of the Revised Code. 870
(60) Sales of children's diapers. 871

H. B. No. 330 Page 31
As Introduced
(61) Sales of therapeutic or preventative creams and wipes 872
marketed primarily for use on the skin of children. 873
(62) Sales of a child restraint device or booster seat 874
that meets the national highway traffic safety administration 875
standard for child restraint systems under 49 C.F.R. 571.213. 876
(63) Sales of cribs intended to provide sleeping 877
accommodations for children that comply with the United States 878
consumer product safety commission's safety standard for full- 879
size baby cribs under 16 C.F.R. 1219 or the commission's safety 880
standard for non-full-size baby cribs under 16 C.F.R. 1220. 881
(64) Sales of strollers meant for transporting children 882
from infancy to about thirty-six months of age that meet the 883
United States consumer product safety commission safety standard 884
for carriages and strollers under 16 C.F.R. 1227.2. 885
(65) The fee imposed by section 3743.22 of the Revised 886
Code, if it is separately stated on the invoice, bill of sale, 887
or similar document given by the vendor to the consumer for a 888
retail sale made in this state. 889
(66) Sales of eligible tangible personal property 890
occurring during the period of a sales tax holiday held pursuant 891
to section 5739.41 of the Revised Code. 892
(67)(a) Sales of a firearm safety device or firearm 893
storage device occurring in March, April, November, or December 894
of any year, excluding a firearm safety device already installed 895
on a firearm, which shall be treated as the sale of a firearm 896
and not the firearm safety device. 897
(b) As used in division (B)(67) of this section: 898
(i) "Firearm safety device" means a device to be equipped 899

H. B. No. 330 Page 32
As Introduced
or installed on a firearm designed to prevent unauthorized 900
access to the firearm or to prevent it from being operated 901
without first deactivating the device. 902
(ii) "Firearm storage device" means a container or 903
enclosure designed for the principal purpose of safely storing a 904
firearm and secured by a combination lock, key lock, or lock 905
based on biometric information which, once locked is incapable 906
of being opened without the combination, key, or biometric 907
information, respectively. 908
(C) For the purpose of the proper administration of this 909
chapter, and to prevent the evasion of the tax, it is presumed 910
that all sales made in this state are subject to the tax until 911
the contrary is established. 912
(D) The tax collected by the vendor from the consumer 913
under this chapter is not part of the price, but is a tax 914
collection for the benefit of the state, and of counties levying 915
an additional sales tax pursuant to section 5739.021 or 5739.026 916
of the Revised Code and of transit authorities levying an 917
additional sales tax pursuant to section 5739.023 of the Revised 918
Code. Except for the discount authorized under section 5739.12 919
of the Revised Code and the effects of any rounding pursuant to 920
section 5703.055 of the Revised Code, no person other than the 921
state or such a county or transit authority shall derive any 922
benefit from the collection or payment of the tax levied by this 923
section or section 5739.021, 5739.023, or 5739.026 of the 924
Revised Code. 925
Sec. 5739.03. (A) Except as provided in section 5739.05 or 926
section 5739.051 of the Revised Code, the tax imposed by or 927
pursuant to section 5739.02, 5739.021, 5739.023, or 5739.026 of 928
the Revised Code shall be paid by the consumer to the vendor, 929

H. B. No. 330 Page 33
As Introduced
and each vendor shall collect from the consumer, as a trustee 930
for the state of Ohio, the full and exact amount of the tax 931
payable on each taxable sale, in the manner and at the times 932
provided as follows: 933
(1) If the price is, at or prior to the provision of the 934
service or the delivery of possession of the thing sold to the 935
consumer, paid in currency passed from hand to hand by the 936
consumer or the consumer's agent to the vendor or the vendor's 937
agent, the vendor or the vendor's agent shall collect the tax 938
with and at the same time as the price; 939
(2) If the price is otherwise paid or to be paid, the 940
vendor or the vendor's agent shall, at or prior to the provision 941
of the service or the delivery of possession of the thing sold 942
to the consumer, charge the tax imposed by or pursuant to 943
section 5739.02, 5739.021, 5739.023, or 5739.026 of the Revised 944
Code to the account of the consumer, which amount shall be 945
collected by the vendor from the consumer in addition to the 946
price. Such sale shall be reported on and the amount of the tax 947
applicable thereto shall be remitted with the return for the 948
period in which the sale is made, and the amount of the tax 949
shall become a legal charge in favor of the vendor and against 950
the consumer. 951
(B)(1)(a) If any sale is claimed to be exempt under 952
division (E) of section 5739.01 of the Revised Code or under 953
section 5739.02 of the Revised Code, with the exception of 954
divisions (B)(1) to (11), (28), (48), (55), (59), or (66), or 955
(67) of section 5739.02 of the Revised Code, the consumer must 956
provide to the vendor, and the vendor must obtain from the 957
consumer, a certificate specifying the reason that the sale is 958
not legally subject to the tax. The certificate shall be in such 959

H. B. No. 330 Page 34
As Introduced
form, and shall be provided either in a hard copy form or 960
electronic form, as the tax commissioner prescribes. 961
(b) A vendor that obtains a fully completed exemption 962
certificate from a consumer is relieved of liability for 963
collecting and remitting tax on any sale covered by that 964
certificate. If it is determined the exemption was improperly 965
claimed, the consumer shall be liable for any tax due on that 966
sale under section 5739.02, 5739.021, 5739.023, or 5739.026 or 967
Chapter 5741. of the Revised Code. Relief under this division 968
from liability does not apply to any of the following: 969
(i) A vendor that fraudulently fails to collect tax; 970
(ii) A vendor that solicits consumers to participate in 971
the unlawful claim of an exemption; 972
(iii) A vendor that accepts an exemption certificate from 973
a consumer that claims an exemption based on who purchases or 974
who sells property or a service, when the subject of the 975
transaction sought to be covered by the exemption certificate is 976
actually received by the consumer at a location operated by the 977
vendor in this state, and this state has posted to its web site 978
an exemption certificate form that clearly and affirmatively 979
indicates that the claimed exemption is not available in this 980
state; 981
(iv) A vendor that accepts an exemption certificate from a 982
consumer who claims a multiple points of use exemption under 983
division (D) of section 5739.033 of the Revised Code, if the 984
item purchased is tangible personal property, other than 985
prewritten computer software. 986
(2) The vendor shall maintain records, including exemption 987
certificates, of all sales on which a consumer has claimed an 988

H. B. No. 330 Page 35
As Introduced
exemption, and provide them to the tax commissioner on request. 989
(3) The tax commissioner may establish an identification 990
system whereby the commissioner issues an identification number 991
to a consumer that is exempt from payment of the tax. The 992
consumer must present the number to the vendor, if any sale is 993
claimed to be exempt as provided in this section. 994
(4) If no certificate is provided or obtained within 995
ninety days after the date on which such sale is consummated, it 996
shall be presumed that the tax applies. Failure to have so 997
provided or obtained a certificate shall not preclude a vendor, 998
within one hundred twenty days after the tax commissioner gives 999
written notice of intent to levy an assessment, from either 1000
establishing that the sale is not subject to the tax, or 1001
obtaining, in good faith, a fully completed exemption 1002
certificate. 1003
(5) Certificates need not be obtained nor provided where 1004
the identity of the consumer is such that the transaction is 1005
never subject to the tax imposed or where the item of tangible 1006
personal property sold or the service provided is never subject 1007
to the tax imposed, regardless of use, or when the sale is in 1008
interstate commerce. 1009
(6) If a transaction is claimed to be exempt under 1010
division (B)(13) of section 5739.02 of the Revised Code, the 1011
contractor shall obtain certification of the claimed exemption 1012
from the contractee. This certification shall be in addition to 1013
an exemption certificate provided by the contractor to the 1014
vendor. A contractee that provides a certification under this 1015
division shall be deemed to be the consumer of all items 1016
purchased by the contractor under the claim of exemption, if it 1017
is subsequently determined that the exemption is not properly 1018

H. B. No. 330 Page 36
As Introduced
claimed. The certification shall be in such form as the tax 1019
commissioner prescribes. 1020
(7) If a transaction is claimed to be exempt under 1021
division (B)(13) of section 5739.02 of the Revised Code, the 1022
person that leases a sports facility, as defined in section 1023
307.696 of the Revised Code, wholly owned by a county may 1024
provide and sign, on behalf of the county, an exemption 1025
certificate required under this section for that exemption. 1026
(C) As used in this division, "contractee" means a person 1027
who seeks to enter or enters into a contract or agreement with a 1028
contractor or vendor for the construction of real property or 1029
for the sale and installation onto real property of tangible 1030
personal property. 1031
Any contractor or vendor may request from any contractee a 1032
certification of what portion of the property to be transferred 1033
under such contract or agreement is to be incorporated into the 1034
realty and what portion will retain its status as tangible 1035
personal property after installation is completed. The 1036
contractor or vendor shall request the certification by 1037
certified mail delivered to the contractee, return receipt 1038
requested. Upon receipt of such request and prior to entering 1039
into the contract or agreement, the contractee shall provide to 1040
the contractor or vendor a certification sufficiently detailed 1041
to enable the contractor or vendor to ascertain the resulting 1042
classification of all materials purchased or fabricated by the 1043
contractor or vendor and transferred to the contractee. This 1044
requirement applies to a contractee regardless of whether the 1045
contractee holds a direct payment permit under section 5739.031 1046
of the Revised Code or provides to the contractor or vendor an 1047
exemption certificate as provided under this section. 1048

H. B. No. 330 Page 37
As Introduced
For the purposes of the taxes levied by this chapter and 1049
Chapter 5741. of the Revised Code, the contractor or vendor may 1050
in good faith rely on the contractee's certification. 1051
Notwithstanding division (B) of section 5739.01 of the Revised 1052
Code, if the tax commissioner determines that certain property 1053
certified by the contractee as tangible personal property 1054
pursuant to this division is, in fact, real property, the 1055
contractee shall be considered to be the consumer of all 1056
materials so incorporated into that real property and shall be 1057
liable for the applicable tax, and the contractor or vendor 1058
shall be excused from any liability on those materials. 1059
If a contractee fails to provide such certification upon 1060
the request of the contractor or vendor, the contractor or 1061
vendor shall comply with the provisions of this chapter and 1062
Chapter 5741. of the Revised Code without the certification. If 1063
the tax commissioner determines that such compliance has been 1064
performed in good faith and that certain property treated as 1065
tangible personal property by the contractor or vendor is, in 1066
fact, real property, the contractee shall be considered to be 1067
the consumer of all materials so incorporated into that real 1068
property and shall be liable for the applicable tax, and the 1069
construction contractor or vendor shall be excused from any 1070
liability on those materials. 1071
This division does not apply to any contract or agreement 1072
where the tax commissioner determines as a fact that a 1073
certification under this division was made solely on the 1074
decision or advice of the contractor or vendor. 1075
(D) Notwithstanding division (B) of section 5739.01 of the 1076
Revised Code, whenever the total rate of tax imposed under this 1077
chapter is increased after the date after a construction 1078

H. B. No. 330 Page 38
As Introduced
contract is entered into, the contractee shall reimburse the 1079
construction contractor for any additional tax paid on tangible 1080
property consumed or services received pursuant to the contract. 1081
(E) A vendor who files a petition for reassessment 1082
contesting the assessment of tax on sales for which the vendor 1083
obtained no valid exemption certificates and for which the 1084
vendor failed to establish that the sales were properly not 1085
subject to the tax during the one-hundred-twenty-day period 1086
allowed under division (B) of this section, may present to the 1087
tax commissioner additional evidence to prove that the sales 1088
were properly subject to a claim of exception or exemption. The 1089
vendor shall file such evidence within ninety days of the 1090
receipt by the vendor of the notice of assessment, except that, 1091
upon application and for reasonable cause, the period for 1092
submitting such evidence shall be extended thirty days. 1093
The commissioner shall consider such additional evidence 1094
in reaching the final determination on the assessment and 1095
petition for reassessment. 1096
(F) Whenever a vendor refunds the price, minus any 1097
separately stated delivery charge, of an item of tangible 1098
personal property on which the tax imposed under this chapter 1099
has been paid, the vendor shall also refund the amount of tax 1100
paid, minus the amount of tax attributable to the delivery 1101
charge. 1102
Sec. 5739.05. (A)(1) The tax commissioner shall enforce 1103
and administer sections 5739.01 to 5739.31 of the Revised Code, 1104
which are hereby declared to be sections which the commissioner 1105
is required to administer within the meaning of sections 5703.17 1106
to 5703.37, 5703.39, 5703.41, and 5703.45 of the Revised Code. 1107
The commissioner may adopt and promulgate, in accordance with 1108

H. B. No. 330 Page 39
As Introduced
sections 119.01 to 119.13 of the Revised Code, such rules as the 1109
commissioner deems necessary to administer sections 5739.01 to 1110
5739.31 of the Revised Code. 1111
(2) On or before the first day of May of each year, the 1112
commissioner shall make available to vendors a notice explaining 1113
the three-day exemption period required under division (B)(55) 1114
of section 5739.02 of the Revised Code. 1115
(3) On or before first day of December and August of each 1116
year, the commissioner shall make available to vendors a notice 1117
explaining the two-month exemption period required under 1118
division (B)(67) of section 5739.02 of the Revised Code 1119
commencing on the following first day of March or November, 1120
respectively. 1121
(B) Upon application, the commissioner may authorize a 1122
vendor to pay on a predetermined basis the tax levied by or 1123
pursuant to section 5739.02, 5739.021, 5739.023, or 5739.026 of 1124
the Revised Code upon sales of things produced or distributed or 1125
services provided by such vendor, and the commissioner may waive 1126
the collection of the tax from the consumer. The commissioner 1127
shall not grant such authority unless the commissioner finds 1128
that the granting of the authority would improve compliance and 1129
increase the efficiency of the administration of the tax. The 1130
person to whom such authority is granted shall post a notice, if 1131
required by the commissioner, at the location where the product 1132
is offered for sale that the tax is included in the selling 1133
price. The commissioner may adopt rules to administer this 1134
division. 1135
(C) Upon application, the commissioner may authorize a 1136
vendor to remit, on the basis of a prearranged agreement under 1137
this division, the tax levied by section 5739.02 or pursuant to 1138

H. B. No. 330 Page 40
As Introduced
section 5739.021, 5739.023, or 5739.026 of the Revised Code. The 1139
proportions and ratios in a prearranged agreement shall be 1140
determined either by a test check conducted by the commissioner 1141
under terms and conditions agreed to by the commissioner and the 1142
vendor or by any other method agreed upon by the vendor and the 1143
commissioner. If the parties are unable to agree to the terms 1144
and conditions of the test check or other method, the 1145
application shall be denied. 1146
If used, the test check shall determine the proportion 1147
that taxable retail sales bear to all of the vendor's retail 1148
sales and the ratio which the tax required to be collected under 1149
sections 5739.02, 5739.021, 5739.023, and 5739.026 of the 1150
Revised Code bears to the receipts from the vendor's taxable 1151
retail sales. 1152
The vendor's liability for remitting the tax shall be 1153
based solely upon the proportions and ratios established in the 1154
agreement until such time that the vendor or the commissioner 1155
believes that the nature of the vendor's business has so changed 1156
as to make the agreement no longer representative. The 1157
commissioner may give notice to the vendor at any time that the 1158
authorization is revoked or the vendor may notify the 1159
commissioner that the vendor no longer elects to report under 1160
the authorization. Such notice shall be delivered to the other 1161
party in the manner provided in section 5703.37 of the Revised 1162
Code. The revocation or cancellation is effective the last day 1163
of the month in which the vendor or the commissioner receives 1164
the notice. 1165
Section 2. That existing sections 5739.02, 5739.03, and 1166
5739.05 of the Revised Code are hereby repealed. 1167
Section 3. The amendment by this act of section 5739.02 of 1168

H. B. No. 330 Page 41
As Introduced
the Revised Code applies on and after the first day of March, 1169
April, November, or December occurring after the effective date 1170
of this section, whichever comes first. 1171